Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.472

International medical graduates—Clinical assessment.

Based on recommendations from the international medical graduate implementation work group, the commission shall adopt a clinical assessment to determine the readiness of international medical graduates to apply and serve in residency programs and adopt a grant award process for distributing funds pursuant to RCW 18.71.475.

[ 2020 c 325 s 2.]